South Dakota, session 2026, SB198.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 13-32:
Except as otherwise provided in this section, a student may not use a cell phone
during the school day, as set by the board of the school district pursuant to § 13-26-1.
A student may use a cell phone during the school day if:
(1) The use of a cell phone is required or permitted as part of an approved medical or
educational accommodation; or
(2) The use of a cell phone is required during an emergency affecting the health,
safety, or well-being of a student or staff member.
The board of each school district shall adopt a policy that sets forth disciplinary
actions for student noncompliance.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.